North Carolina, session 2025, HB90.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) G.S. 135-5 is amended by adding a new subsection to read:
"(aaaa) Effective July 1, 2025, the retirement allowance payable to, or on account of,
beneficiaries whose retirement commenced on or before July 1, 2024, is increased by three
percent (3%) of the allowance payable on June 1, 2024, in accordance with subsection (o) of this
section. Effective July 1, 2025, the retirement allowance payable to, or on account of,
beneficiaries whose retirement commenced after July 1, 2024, but before June 30, 2025, is
increased by a prorated amount of three percent (3%), as determined by the Board of Trustees
based upon the number of months that a retirement allowance was paid between July 1, 2024,
and June 30, 2025."
SECTION 1.(b) G.S. 135-65 is amended by adding a new subsection to read:
"(ll) Effective July 1, 2025, the retirement allowance payable to, or on account of,
beneficiaries whose retirement commenced on or before July 1, 2024, is increased by three
percent (3%) of the allowance payable on June 1, 2024. Effective July 1, 2025, the retirement
allowance payable to, or on account of, beneficiaries whose retirement commenced after July 1,
2024, but before June 30, 2025, is increased by a prorated amount of three percent (3%), as
determined by the Board of Trustees based upon the number of months that a retirement
allowance was paid between July 1, 2024, and June 30, 2025."
SECTION 1.(c) G.S. 120-4.22A is amended by adding a new subsection to read:
"(ff) In accordance with subsection (a) of this section, effective July 1, 2025, the retirement
allowance payable to, or on account of, beneficiaries whose retirement commenced on or before
January 1, 2025, is increased by three percent (3%) of the allowance payable on June 1, 2025.
Effective July 1, 2025, the retirement allowance payable to, or on account of, beneficiaries whose
retirement commenced after January 1, 2025, but before June 30, 2025, is increased by a prorated
amount of three percent (3%), as determined by the Board of Trustees based upon the number of
months that a retirement allowance was paid between January 1, 2025, and June 30, 2025."
SECTION 1.(d) G.S. 128-27 is amended by adding a new subsection to read:
"(hhh) Effective July 1, 2025, the retirement allowance payable to, or on account of,
beneficiaries whose retirement commenced on or before July 1, 2024, is increased by three
*H90-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
percent (3%) of the allowance payable on June 1, 2025, in accordance with subsection (k) of this
section. Effective July 1, 2025, the retirement allowance payable to, or on account of,
beneficiaries whose retirement commenced after July 1, 2024, but before June 30, 2025, is
increased by a prorated amount of three percent (3%), as determined by the Board of Trustees
based upon the number of months that a retirement allowance was paid between July 1, 2024,
and June 30, 2025."
SECTION 2. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Reserve for Retiree
Cost-of-Living Adjustments the sum of two hundred fifty million dollars ($250,000,000) in
recurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to implement Section 1 of this act.
SECTION 3. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
Page 2 House Bill 90-First Edition